Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6702XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2257 Section 1. Section 724.8, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 1 are amended by striking the subsections. 2 Sec. 2. Section 724.8B, Code 2026, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 724.8B Persons ineligible to carry dangerous weapons. 5 A person determined to be ineligible to receive a permit 6 to carry weapons under section 724.8, subsection 2, 3, 4, 5, 7 or 6 , a person who illegally possesses a controlled substance 8 included in chapter 124, subchapter II , or a person who is 9 committing an indictable offense is prohibited from carrying 10 dangerous weapons. Unless otherwise provided by law, a person 11 who violates this section commits a serious misdemeanor. 12 Sec. 3. Section 724.15, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 13 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 14 Sec. 4. Section 724.16, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 15 amended to read as follows: 16 1. A person shall not transfer a firearm to another person 17 if the person knows or reasonably should know that the other 18 person is ineligible to possess carry dangerous weapons 19 pursuant to section 724.8B , is intoxicated as provided under 20 the conditions set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or is 21 prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm under section 22 724.26 or federal law. 23 2. A person shall not loan or rent a firearm to another 24 person for temporary use during lawful activities if the 25 person knows or reasonably should know that the other person 26 is ineligible to possess carry dangerous weapons pursuant to 27 section 724.8B , is intoxicated as provided under the conditions 28 set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or is prohibited from 29 receiving or possessing a firearm under section 724.26 or 30 federal law. 31